Florida, session 2026, SB1710.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 69 70 Section 1.âEffective January 1, 2027, section 944.101, 71 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 72 944.101âOffice of the Department of Corrections 73 Ombudsperson.â 74 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 75 (a)ââFamily memberâ includes a grandparent, a parent, a 76 sibling, a spouse or domestic partner, a child, an aunt, an 77 uncle, a cousin, a niece, a nephew, a grandchild, or any other 78 person related to an incarcerated person by blood, adoption, 79 marriage, or a fostering relationship. 80 (b)ââOfficeâ means the Office of the Department of 81 Corrections Ombudsperson. 82 (2)âThe Office of the Department of Corrections 83 Ombudsperson is created within the department. 84 (a)âThe office shall be composed of the following sections: 85 1.âThe Inspections Section. 86 2.âThe Complaints Investigation Section. 87 (b)âThe office shall: 88 1.âProvide information, as appropriate, to incarcerated 89 persons, family members, representatives of incarcerated 90 persons, department employees and contractors, and others 91 regarding the rights of incarcerated persons; 92 2.âMonitor conditions of confinement and assess department 93 compliance with applicable federal, state, and local rules, 94 regulations, policies, and best practices as they relate to the 95 health, safety, welfare, and rehabilitation of incarcerated 96 persons; 97 3.âProvide technical assistance to support incarcerated 98 persons in self-advocacy; 99 4.âProvide technical assistance to local governments in the 100 creation of jail oversight bodies, as requested; 101 5.âEstablish a statewide uniform reporting system to 102 collect and analyze data related to complaints received by the 103 department, and data related to all of the following: 104 a.âDeaths, suicides, and suicide attempts of incarcerated 105 persons while in custody; 106 b.âPhysical and sexual assaults of incarcerated persons 107 while in custody; 108 c.âThe number of incarcerated persons placed in 109 administrative segregation or solitary confinement, and the 110 duration of stays in such confinement; 111 d.âThe number of facility lockdowns lasting longer than 24 112 hours; 113 e.âThe number of staff vacancies at each facility; 114 f.âThe incarcerated-person-to-staff ratios at each 115 facility; 116 g.âThe staff tenure and turnover; 117 h.âThe numbers of in-person visits to incarcerated persons 118 which were granted and denied at each facility; 119 i.âThe types of programming, with data disaggregated by 120 program, relating to participation, waiting lists, and 121 exclusionary or inclusionary factors; 122 j.âThe number of contraband items confiscated and the types 123 of contraband confiscated; and 124 k.âDemographic data on the prison population, disaggregated 125 by race, ethnicity, gender, and age; 126 6.âEstablish procedures to gather stakeholder input into 127 the officeâs activities and priorities, which must include, at a 128 minimum, an annual 30-day period for receipt of, and office 129 response to, public comment; 130 7.âInspect each department facility at least once every 3 131 years, and at least once each year for each maximum security 132 facility and each facility where the office has found cause for 133 more frequent inspection or monitoring; and 134 8.âPublicly issue periodic facility inspection reports; an 135 annual report with recommendations on the state of department 136 facilities and a summary of data and recommendations arising 137 from any complaints investigated and resolved pursuant to this 138 section or s. 944.102; and any other thematic reports covering 139 any topic the office finds relevant to running a safe, secure, 140 and humane corrections department. 141 (c)âThe office is directed by the Ombudsperson, who must be 142 selected by the Corrections Oversight Committee and serves a 143 term of 6 years, during which the Ombudsperson may be removed 144 only by the Governor and only for good cause. The Ombudsperson 145 may not be a current or former employee or contractor of the 146 department, and the Ombudspersonâs spouse or domestic partner, 147 parents, grandparents, children, or siblings may not be current 148 employees or contractors of the department. 149 (d)âThe Ombudsperson has the authority: 150 1.âTo hire staff, contractors, and unpaid volunteers and to 151 secure office space, equipment, and other services necessary to 152 carry out the duties of the office pursuant to this section and 153 s. 944.102. Any employee, contractor, or unpaid volunteer hired 154 or retained by the office has the same authority and powers of 155 the office as described in this section and s. 944.102; and 156 2.âTo contract with experts as needed to assist in the 157 monitoring and inspection of facilities, in the assessment of 158 data, and in the review, investigation, or resolution of 159 complaints. 160 (e)âA staff member, an expert, or a volunteer hired by the 161 Ombudsperson has the same authority and duties of the office as 162 described in this section. To avoid conflicts of interest around 163 particular topics or facilities, the Ombudsperson shall develop 164 a recusal process for staff and volunteers who have been 165 department employees or contractors in the last 5 years or whose 166 parents, children, spouses, or domestic partners are current 167 department employees or contractors. A staff member or volunteer 168 hired by the Ombudsperson may not be a current employee or 169 contractor of the department. 170 (f)âThe Ombudsperson shall coordinate and collaborate with 171 other state agencies and entities, including, but not limited 172 to, the departmentâs inspector general or the Auditor General, 173 mandated protection and advocacy organizations, and safety and 174 environmental entities. 175 (g)âThe Ombudsperson shall manage all appropriations and 176 funding of the office. 177 (3)âThere is established a Corrections Oversight Committee, 178 composed of: 179 (a)âTwo members appointed by the President of the Senate 180 who are not members of the same political party. The President 181 of the Senate shall select one of the two members to serve as 182 co-chair. 183 (b)âTwo members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 184 Representatives who are not members of the same political party. 185 The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall select one of 186 the two members to serve as co-chair. 187 (c)âThe following members, appointed by the Governor: 188 1.âOne representative of a prisoner advocacy organization. 189 2.âOne representative of an organization that provides 190 training or rehabilitation programs for incarcerated persons. 191 3.âOne man who was formerly incarcerated in a facility of 192 the department. 193 4.âOne woman who was formerly incarcerated in a facility of 194 the department. 195 5.âOne physician, currently licensed or retired, with 196 experience in family medicine or internal medicine. 197 6.âOne mental or behavioral health professional, currently 198 licensed or retired, who has a history of providing mental 199 health services or counseling to adults. 200 7.âOne person who is a grandparent, parent, child, sibling, 201 or spouse or domestic partner of a person currently incarcerated 202 in a department facility. 203 8.âOne person who was formerly employed as a correctional 204 employee in this state or any other state. 205 (d)âMembers of the committee shall serve for terms of 3 206 years. The Governor shall make all subsequent appointments. 207 (e)âA member of the committee may not be a current employee 208 or contractor of the department. To avoid conflicts of interest 209 around particular topics, facilities, or nominees, the committee 210 shall develop a recusal process for members who have been 211 employees or contractors in the previous 5 years or whose 212 parent, child, spouse, or domestic partner is currently a 213 department employee or contractor. With the exception of the 214 members in subparagraphs (c)2. and 8., a committee member may 215 not have been an employee or a contractor of the department at 216 any time during the 5 years immediately before his or her 217 appointment to the committee. 218 (f)âThe committee shall meet upon the call of the co-chairs 219 or the majority of the members or whenever there is a vacancy in 220 the Ombudsperson position. 221 (g)âCommittee members are not eligible to receive 222 compensation but are eligible for reimbursement for per diem and 223 travel expenses. 224 (h)âThe committee shall announce the Ombudsperson nominee 225 publicly and vote to appoint the nominee after holding a public 226 hearing, during which the committee shall hear and consider oral 227 or written testimony from the Ombudsperson nominee, any 228 witnesses the Ombudsperson nominee presents on his or her 229 behalf, and any members of the public. The Ombudsperson nominee 230 shall take office upon a majority vote of the committee in his 231 or her favor. In the event of a vacancy, the committee shall 232 announce a nominee within 6 months after resignation, removal, 233 or expiration of term of the sitting Ombudsperson. 234 (i)âThe committee shall hold at least one public hearing 235 each year to present, review, and discuss the officeâs 236 inspections, findings, reports, and recommendations set forth in 237 the officeâs annual report and shall hold quarterly public 238 hearings to present, review, and discuss any other data, 239 reports, or findings of the office which the committee feels are 240 relevant. At such hearings, the committee may solicit and 241 receive written or oral testimony from experts, members of the 242 community, the office, or the department. 243 (j)âThe committee may, in its discretion or upon request 244 from the office, issue findings, recommendations, and policy and 245 legislative proposals that must be provided to the department, 246 the Governor, and the judiciary committees of each house of the 247 Legislature and made available to the public on the officeâs 248 website. 249 (k)âThe committee must be given the same access to 250 facilities, records, and persons within facilities as the office 251 receives pursuant to this section. If the position of 252 Ombudsperson is vacant, the committee may subpoena department 253 records, employees, or contractors. 254 (l)âAccompanied by the office, the committee shall visit 255 two different correctional facilities during each calendar year. 256 (4)(a)âThe office must have reasonable access, upon demand 257 in person or in writing and with or without prior notice, to all 258 department facilities, including all areas that are used by 259 incarcerated persons and all areas that are accessible to 260 incarcerated persons, and to programs for incarcerated persons 261 at reasonable times, which, at a minimum, must include normal 262 working hours and visiting hours. This authority includes the 263 opportunity to conduct an interview with any incarcerated 264 person, department employee or contractor, or other person. This 265 access is for all of the following purposes: 266 1.âProviding information about individual rights and the 267 services available from the office, including the name, address, 268 and telephone number of the office facilities or staff; 269 2.âConducting official inspections under subsection (6); 270 3.âConducting an official investigation under subsection 271 (7) or as described in s. 944.102; and 272 4.âInspecting, viewing, photographing, or video recording 273 all areas of the facility which are used by incarcerated persons 274 or are accessible to incarcerated persons. 275 (b)âAccess to incarcerated persons includes the opportunity 276 to meet and communicate privately and confidentially with 277 individuals regularly, with or without prior notice, formally or 278 informally, by telephone, mail, electronic communication, or in 279 person. In the case of communications with incarcerated persons, 280 these communications may not be monitored by, recorded, or 281 conducted in the presence of department employees or 282 contractors. 283 (c)âThe office may access, inspect, and copy all 284 information, records, or documents in the possession or control 285 of the department which the office considers necessary in an 286 investigation of a complaint filed under this section or s. 287 944.102, and the department shall assist the office in obtaining 288 any necessary releases for those documents that are specifically 289 restricted or privileged for use by the office. 290 (d)âFollowing notification from the office with a written 291 demand for access to department records, the designated 292 department staff shall provide the office with access to the 293 requested documentation no later than 20 days after the officeâs 294 written request for the records. If the records requested by the 295 office pertain to an incarcerated personâs death; threats of 296 bodily harm, including, but not limited to, sexual or physical 297 assaults; or the denial of necessary medical treatment, the 298 records must be provided within 5 days unless the office 299 consents to an extension of that timeframe. 300 (e)âThe office shall work with the department to minimize 301 disruption to the departmentâs operations due to office 302 activities and must comply with the departmentâs security 303 clearance processes, provided that these processes do not impede 304 the activities outlined in this section. 305 (f)âThe office may subpoena department records, employees, 306 or contractors. 307 (g)âThe department has an affirmative duty to provide data 308 related to the collection and dissemination of information under 309 subparagraph (2)(b)5. 310 (5)(a)âCorrespondence and communication with the office, 311 including that made pursuant to s. 944.102, are confidential and 312 must be protected as privileged correspondence in the same 313 manner as legal correspondence or communication. 314 (b)âThe office shall establish confidentiality rules and 315 procedures for all information maintained by the office to 316 ensure that: 317 1.âDepartment employees or contractors are not aware of the 318 identity of a person who submits a complaint or inquiry before, 319 during, or after an investigation, to the greatest extent 320 practicable. The office may disclose personal identifying 321 information for the sole purpose of carrying out an 322 investigation; and 323 2.âOther persons in department custody are not aware of the 324 identity of a person who submits a complaint or inquiry before, 325 during, or after an investigation, to the greatest extent 326 practicable. The office may disclose personal identifying 327 information for the sole purpose of carrying out an 328 investigation. 329 (6)âThe office shall conduct periodic inspections of each 330 department facility. 331 (a)âInitial inspection.âThe office shall conduct an 332 inspection of each department facility and release a public 333 report by July 1, 2029. 334 (b)âSubsequent inspection.âSubsequent inspections of each 335 facility must be conducted on a staggered schedule dependent on 336 the facilityâs safety and compliance classification. 337 (c)âInspection assessment.âThe office shall conduct a 338 complete inspection of a department facility which covers all 339 matters pertinent to the welfare of staff and incarcerated 340 persons within the facility, including, but not limited to, an 341 assessment of all of the following: 342 1.âAll policies and procedures in place at the facility 343 related to the care of incarcerated persons. 344 2.âConditions of confinement. 345 3.âAvailability to incarcerated persons of educational and 346 rehabilitative programming, drug and mental health treatment, 347 and jobs and vocational training. 348 4.âAll policies and procedures related to visitation. 349 5.âAll medical facilities and medical procedures and 350 policies. 351 6.âLockdowns at the facility in the time since the last 352 audit. For an initial assessment, the office shall review 353 lockdowns from the last 3 years. 354 7.âStaffing at the facility, including the number and job 355 assignments of correctional staff, the ratio of staff to 356 incarcerated persons at the facility, and the staff position 357 vacancy rate at the facility. 358 8.âPhysical and sexual assaults at the facility in the time 359 since the last inspection. For an initial assessment, the office 360 shall review assaults from the last 3 years. 361 9.âIncarcerated person or staff deaths that occurred at the 362 facility in the time since the last inspection. For an initial 363 assessment, the office shall review incarcerated person and 364 staff deaths from the last 3 years. 365 10.âDepartment staff recruitment, training, supervision, 366 and discipline. 367 11.âProgramming within the facility, including type of 368 programming, program eligibility, and length of waiting list, if 369 applicable. 370 12.âAny other aspect of the operation of the facility which 371 the office deems necessary over the course of an inspection. 372 (d)âReport.âUpon completion of an inspection, the office 373 shall produce a report and make it publicly available on its 374 website and submit the report to the Governor, the Attorney 375 General, the judiciary committees of each house of the 376 Legislature, and the secretary of the department. The report 377 must include all of the following: 378 1.âA summary of the facilityâs policies and procedures 379 related to the care of the incarcerated persons. 380 2.âA characterization of the conditions of confinement. 381 3.âA catalog of the educational and rehabilitative 382 programming, drug and mental health treatment, and jobs and 383 vocational training available to incarcerated persons. 384 4.âA summary of visitation policies and procedures. 385 5.âA summary of medical facilities and medical procedures 386 and policies. 387 6.âA summary of the lockdowns reviewed by the office. 388 7.âA summary of the staffing at the facility, including 389 policies relating to staff recruitment, training, supervision, 390 and discipline. 391 8.âA summary of physical and sexual assaults reviewed by 392 the office. 393 9.âA summary of any incarcerated person or staff deaths 394 that occurred at the facility. 395 10.âRecommendations made to the facility to improve safety 396 and conditions within the facility. 397 11.âSafety and compliance classification with recommended 398 timeline for the next inspection. 399 (e)âSafety and compliance classification.âUpon completion 400 of an inspection, the office shall assign the facility a safety 401 and compliance classification. The classification system must be 402 divided into 3 tiers and be determined based on the factors 403 described in this paragraph. The safety and compliance 404 classification are: 405 1.âTier 1. This classification requires subsequent 406 inspection within 12 months and is used for maximum security 407 facilities and facilities that present clear violations of 408 rights, risks to the safety of incarcerated persons, or severe 409 lack of quality programming for the successful rehabilitation of 410 incarcerated persons. 411 2.âTier 2. This classification requires subsequent 412 inspection between 18 months and 36 months and is used for 413 facilities that may have violations of rights, substandard 414 conditions of confinement, or substandard programming options. 415 3.âTier 3. This classification requires subsequent 416 inspection within 36 months and is used for facilities with 417 adequate conditions of confinement and programming options. 418 (f)âResponses.âThe department shall respond in writing to 419 each inspection report issued by the office within 60 days after 420 issuance of the report, and its response must include a 421 corrective action plan. The office shall monitor the 422 departmentâs compliance with the corrective action plan and may 423 conduct further inspections or investigations as necessary to 424 ensure compliance. 425 (7)(a)âThe office may initiate and attempt to resolve a 426 complaint investigation upon its own initiative, or upon receipt 427 of a complaint from an incarcerated person, a family member, a 428 representative of an incarcerated person, a department employee 429 or contractor, or others, regarding any of the following that 430 may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of 431 incarcerated persons: 432 1.âAbuse or neglect. 433 2.âConditions of confinement. 434 3.âDepartment decisions or administrative actions. 435 4.âDepartment inactions or omissions. 436 5.âDepartment policies, rules, or procedures. 437 6.âAlleged violations of law by department employees or 438 contractors which may adversely affect the health, safety, 439 welfare, or rights of incarcerated persons. 440 (b)âThe office may decline to investigate any complaint. If 441 the office does not investigate a complaint, the office must 442 notify the person who submitted the complaint in writing of the 443 decision not to investigate and the reasons for the decision. 444 (c)âFiling a complaint with the office, or any action or 445 lack of action on a complaint by the office, may not be deemed 446 an administrative procedure required for exhaustion of remedies 447 prior to bringing an action pursuant to the Prison Litigation 448 Reform Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 1997e. 449 (d)âThe office may not investigate a complaint relating to 450 an incarcerated personâs underlying criminal conviction. 451 (e)âThe office may not investigate a complaint from a 452 department employee or contractor which relates to the 453 employeeâs or contractorâs employment relationship with the 454 department unless the complaint is related to the health, 455 safety, welfare, or rehabilitation of incarcerated persons. 456 (f)âThe office may refer the person who submitted a 457 complaint and others to appropriate resources or state, tribal, 458 or federal agencies, as applicable. 459 (g)âThe office may not levy any fees for the submission or 460 investigation of complaints. 461 (h)âAt the conclusion of an investigation of a complaint, 462 the office shall render a public decision on the merits of each 463 complaint, except that the documents supporting the decision are 464 subject to the confidentiality provision of this section. The 465 office shall communicate the decision to the person who 466 submitted the complaint and to the department. The office must 467 state its recommendations and reasoning if, in the officeâs 468 opinion, the department or any employee or contractor thereof 469 should: 470 1.âConsider the matter further; 471 2.âModify or cancel any action; 472 3.âAlter a rule, practice, or ruling; 473 4.âExplain in detail the administrative action in question; 474 or 475 5.âRectify an omission. 476 (i)âUpon a request by the office, the department shall, 477 within the time specified or within a reasonable time, inform 478 the office in writing about any action taken on the 479 recommendations or the reasons for not complying with the 480 recommendations. 481 (j)âIf the office believes, based on the investigation, 482 that there has been or continues to be a significant health, 483 safety, welfare, or rehabilitation issue, the office must report 484 the finding to the Governor, the Attorney General, the judiciary 485 committees of each house of the Legislature, and the secretary 486 of the department. 487 (k)âIf the department conducts an internal disciplinary 488 investigation and review of one or more of its staff members as 489 a result of an office investigation, the departmentâs 490 disciplinary review may be subject to additional review and 491 investigation by the office to ensure a fair and objective 492 process. 493 (l)âBefore announcing a conclusion or recommendation that 494 expressly, or by implication, criticizes a person or the 495 department, the office shall consult with that person or the 496 department. The office may request to be notified by the 497 department, within a specified time, of any action taken on any 498 recommendation presented. 499 (m)âThe department and its employees and contractors may 500 not terminate, retaliate against, or in any manner discriminate 501 against any person because he or she has filed a complaint or 502 instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or 503 related to this subsection. 504 1.âAny alleged termination of, retaliation against, or 505 discrimination against a person who submitted a complaint may be 506 considered by the office as an appropriate subject of an 507 investigation. 508 2.âAny department employee or contractor who believes that 509 he or she has been terminated or otherwise discriminated against 510 by a person in violation of this subsection may, within 30 days 511 after such violation occurs, file a complaint pursuant to the 512 stateâs whistleblower or wrongful termination laws, or both. 513 (8)(a)âBy December 31 of each year, the office shall 514 produce an annual report and make it publicly available on its 515 website and submit it to the Governor, the Attorney General, the 516 judiciary committees of each house of the Legislature, and the 517 secretary of the department. The report must include all of the 518 following: 519 1.âA summary of the officeâs inspections and complaint 520 investigations conducted that calendar year, including the 521 officeâs findings and recommendations and the departmentâs 522 responses and corrective actions. 523 2.âA characterization of the conditions of confinement. 524 3.âA summary of educational and rehabilitative programming, 525 drug and mental health treatment, and jobs and vocational 526 training available to incarcerated persons. 527 4.âA summary of visitation policies and procedures. 528 5.âA summary of medical facilities and medical procedures 529 and policies. 530 6.âA summary of the lockdowns reviewed by the office. 531 7.âA summary of the staffing at each facility and in the 532 department overall. 533 8.âA summary of physical and sexual assaults reviewed by 534 the office. 535 9.âA summary of any incarcerated person or staff deaths 536 that occurred at a facility. 537 10.âA summary of the officeâs investigations, findings, and 538 resolutions of any complaints submitted pursuant to this section 539 or s. 944.102. 540 11.âA summary of the pending and settled lawsuits during 541 the previous calendar year in which the department or its 542 contractors are a party and which relate to any covered issue as 543 defined in s. 944.102, with a description of the nature of the 544 claims, their date and location, and attorney fees, court costs, 545 and settlement costs spent by the department, its contractors, 546 or the state. 547 12.âA summary of the criminal prosecutions of department 548 employees, contractors, or incarcerated persons initiated or 549 concluded during the previous calendar year, with a description 550 of the dates and locations of the alleged offenses, the nature 551 of the charges, and any adjudication or disposition of the 552 cases. 553 13.âRecommendations to the Legislature and the department, 554 including, but not limited to, all of the following: 555 a.âHow the office and the department could be better funded 556 and staffed. 557 b.âHow to improve staff retention, training, working 558 conditions, compensation, benefits, morale, and safety. 559 c.âHow to improve incarcerated person health, safety, 560 conditions of confinement, or medical care. 561 d.âHow to improve visitation and limiting the use of 562 lockdowns and administrative segregation or solitary 563 confinement. 564 e.âHow to improve complaint investigation and resolution. 565 f.âHow to improve access to and quality and availability of 566 educational and rehabilitative programming, drug and mental 567 health treatment, and jobs and vocational training to 568 incarcerated persons. 569 g.âHow to improve transparency about conditions in the 570 facilities and the department overall. 571 h.âHow to improve the disciplinary process to hold staff 572 accountable for mistreatment of incarcerated persons. 573 i.âHow to prevent future violations of incarcerated 574 personsâ rights protected under state and federal law. 575 (b)âUpon a request by the office, the department shall, 576 within the time specified or within a reasonable time, inform 577 the office in writing about any action taken on the 578 recommendations or the reasons for not complying with the 579 recommendations. 580 (9)âThe department and the office may adopt rules to enact 581 this section. 582 Section 2.âSection 944.102, Florida Statutes, is created to 583 read: 584 944.102âIncarcerated person and family support services; 585 function of the Office of the Department of Corrections 586 Ombudsperson.â 587 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 588 (a)ââCovered issueâ includes, but is not limited to, all of 589 the following: 590 1.âSanitation in prison facilities. 591 2.âAccess to proper nutrition. 592 3.âLivable temperatures in prison facilities. 593 4.âPhysical or sexual abuse from fellow incarcerated 594 persons. 595 5.âPhysical or sexual abuse from department staff or 596 contractors. 597 6.âCredible threats against an incarcerated person from 598 another incarcerated person, staff, or contractors. 599 7.âNeglect of prison staff or contractors which results in 600 physical or sexual trauma. 601 8.âDenial of rights afforded to incarcerated persons under 602 federal or state law. 603 9.âAccess to visitation and communication with family. 604 10.âAny instance in which the office determines an action 605 or behavior to be such that it constitutes abuse or neglect 606 against an incarcerated person. 607 11.âAccess to medical or mental health care or substance 608 abuse treatment. 609 12.âAccess to educational and rehabilitative programming, 610 drug and mental health treatment, and incarcerated person jobs 611 and vocational training. 612 (b)ââFamily formâ means a secure online form created by the 613 office through which a family member can submit a complaint or 614 an inquiry. 615 (c)ââFamily memberâ has the same meaning as in s. 944.101. 616 (d)ââIncarcerated person formâ means a secure online form 617 available through the departmentâs intranet through which an 618 incarcerated person can submit a complaint or inquiries 619 regarding covered issues on his or her behalf. 620 (e)ââOfficeâ means the Office of the Department of 621 Corrections Ombudsperson. 622 (2)âFAMILY ADVOCACY AND SUPPORT SERVICES ONLINE FORM.âThe 623 office shall create an electronic family form and make it 624 publicly available on the officeâs website so that family 625 members, friends, and advocates can submit complaints and 626 inquiries regarding covered issues on behalf of a person 627 incarcerated within the department. Upon receipt of a family 628 form, the office shall: 629 (a)âConfirm receipt of the family form within 5 business 630 days after receipt; 631 (b)âDetermine whether an investigation is warranted within 632 7 business days after the confirmation of receipt of the form 633 and notify the person who submitted the form of the officeâs 634 determination; and 635 (c)âIf the office determines an investigation is 636 unwarranted, provide a written statement explaining its decision 637 to the person who submitted the form. 638 (3)âINCARCERATED PERSON ADVOCACY AND SUPPORT SERVICES 639 ONLINE FORM.âThe office shall create an incarcerated person 640 advocacy and support services form. 641 (a)âAvailability.âThe department shall ensure that the 642 incarcerated person form is available and operating on at least 643 12 computers within each department facility and accessible to 644 all incarcerated persons from 7:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m. each day. 645 For incarcerated persons in administrative segregation or 646 solitary confinement, the department shall ensure that employees 647 and contractors provide incarcerated persons with access to the 648 incarcerated person form on a computer or computer tablet or by 649 providing a paper copy upon the incarcerated personâs request. 650 The department shall make paper copies of the incarcerated 651 person form available, at no cost to incarcerated persons, in 652 each facilityâs library, law library, and recreational and 653 medical facilities. 654 (b)âConfidentiality.âThe office shall create the 655 incarcerated person form in a secure format that excludes any 656 electronic monitoring or reproduction by the department or its 657 employees or contractors. Any submissions of paper copies of the 658 incarcerated person form by an incarcerated person must be 659 treated as confidential and privileged by department employees 660 or contractors in the same manner as legal correspondence or 661 communication. 662 (c)âRequirements.âThe office shall: 663 1.âConfirm receipt of the incarcerated person form within 5 664 business days after receipt; 665 2.âDetermine whether an investigation is warranted within 7 666 business days after the confirmation of receipt of the form and 667 notify the person who submitted the form of the officeâs 668 determination; and 669 3.âIf the office determines an investigation is 670 unwarranted, provide a written statement explaining its decision 671 to the person who submitted the form. 672 (4)âFAMILY ADVOCACY AND SUPPORT SERVICES HOTLINE.âThe 673 office shall create a telephone hotline that family members, 674 friends, and advocates of incarcerated persons can call to file 675 complaints and inquiries regarding covered issues on behalf of a 676 person incarcerated within the department. The office shall: 677 (a)âConfirm receipt of the complaint or inquiry within 5 678 business days after its receipt; 679 (b)âDetermine whether an investigation is warranted within 680 7 business days after the confirmation of receipt of the 681 complaint or inquiry and notify the person who submitted the 682 complaint or inquiry; and 683 (c)âIf the office determines an investigation is 684 unwarranted, provide a written statement explaining its decision 685 to the person who submitted the complaint or inquiry. 686 (5)âADVOCACY AND SUPPORT SERVICES HOTLINE.âThe office shall 687 create a secure telephone hotline that all department employees 688 and contractors and incarcerated persons can call to file 689 complaints and inquiries regarding covered issues on their own 690 behalf. 691 (a)âProhibition on phone call fees.âThe secretary of the 692 department shall ensure that the hotline and its use are made 693 available to all incarcerated persons free of charge. 694 (b)âConfidentiality.âThe office and the secretary of the 695 department shall ensure that calls to the hotline are not 696 monitored or recorded by department employees or contractors. 697 (c)âRequirements.âThe office shall: 698 1.âConfirm receipt of the complaint or inquiry within 5 699 business days after receipt; 700 2.âDetermine whether an investigation is warranted within 7 701 business days after the confirmation of receipt of the complaint 702 or inquiry and notify the person who submitted the complaint or 703 inquiry of the officeâs determination; and 704 3.âIf the office determines an investigation is 705 unwarranted, provide a written statement explaining its decision 706 to the person who submitted the complaint or inquiry. 707 (6)âBAN ON RETALIATION.âThe department and its employees 708 and contractors may not terminate, retaliate against, or in any 709 manner discriminate against a person because he or she has filed 710 a complaint or inquiry or instituted or caused to be instituted 711 any proceeding under or related to this section. 712 (a)âAny alleged termination of, retaliation against, or 713 discrimination against the person who submitted the complaint or 714 inquiry may be considered by the office as an appropriate 715 subject of an investigation. 716 (b)âA department employee or contractor who believes that 717 he or she has been terminated or otherwise discriminated against 718 by any person in violation of this subsection may, within 30 719 days after such violation occurs, file a complaint pursuant to 720 the stateâs whistleblower or wrongful termination laws, or both. 721 (7)âFEDERAL CLAIMS.âA complaint or lack of complaint to the 722 office or any action or lack of action by the office on a 723 complaint made pursuant to this section may not be deemed an 724 administrative procedure required for exhaustion of remedies 725 before bringing an action pursuant to the Prison Litigation 726 Reform Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 1997e. 727 (8)âRULES.âThe department and the office may adopt rules to 728 enact this section. 729 Section 3.â(1)âSpending on the Office of the Department of 730 Corrections Ombudsperson to carry out the activities in this act 731 must equal an amount between 0.5 percent and 1 percent of the 732 Department of Correctionsâ annual appropriation. 733 (2)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year through the 734 2031-2032 fiscal year, the recurring sum of $1.5 million is 735 appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of 736 Corrections to implement this act. 737 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 738 act, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.